Arkansas, session 2025, SB46.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 6-5-302 is amended to read as follows:
6-5-302. Allocation and transfer of funds.
From the moneys accruing to the Educational Excellence Trust Fund, the
Treasurer of State on the last day of the month shall transfer to the various
funds and fund accounts listed below, the amounts determined by applying each
fund or fund account's proportionate part of the total of all such
allocations set forth in this section to the amount available for
distribution as determined in § 6-5-301:
*CRH024*
01/13/2025 9:34:15 AM CRH024

SB46

FISCAL YEAR ENDING
Fund or Fund Accounts June 30, 2002 June 30, 2003
& Thereafter
Division of Elementary and Secondary Education Public School Fund Account
$161,935,727 $164,138,382
Division of Career and Technical Education Public School Fund Account
9,518,065 10,032,555
Division of Elementary and Secondary Education Fund Account
762,901 804,138
Division of Career and Technical Education Fund Account
2,856,557 3,010,965
Higher Education Grants Fund Account 10,499,767 11,067,322
School for Math, Sciences, and Arts Fund 0 5,988,465
Institutions of Higher Education:
Arkansas State University Fund 4,797,713 5,057,049
Arkansas Tech University Fund 1,608,226 1,695,157
Henderson State University Fund 1,663,634 1,753,560
Southern Arkansas University Fund 983,576 1,036,743
University of Arkansas Fund 11,905,301 12,548,830
University of Arkansas at Little Rock Fund 4,224,809 4,453,177
University of Arkansas Medical Center Fund 7,274,293 7,667,498
University of Arkansas Medical Center Fund - Indigent Care
181,013 190,797
University of Arkansas at Monticello Fund 848,858 894,742
University of Arkansas at Pine Bluff Fund 1,473,599 1,553,253
University of Central Arkansas Fund 3,661,359 3,859,270
Arkansas State University-Beebe Fund 1,144,646 1,206,518
University of Arkansas East Arkansas Community College Fund
599,022 631,401
National Park College Fund 895,921 944,349
Arkansas Northeastern College Fund 573,810 604,827
North Arkansas College Fund 353,775 372,898
Northwest Arkansas Community College Fund 791,763 834,561
Phillips Community College of the University of Arkansas Fund
583,366 614,899
01/13/2025 9:34:15 AM CRH024

SB46
University of Arkansas Community College at Rich Mountain Fund
158,120 166,667
SAU-Tech Fund 256,801 270,683
South Arkansas Community College Fund 409,688 431,833
University of Arkansas at Fort Smith Fund 2,437,691 2,569,458
TOTAL INSTITUTIONS OF HIGHER EDUCATION $ 46,826,984 $ 49,358,170

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code §§ 6-51-1101 — 6-51-1104 are repealed.
6-51-1101. Merger.
(a)(1) This subchapter shall govern the merger of Crowley's Ridge
Technical Institute and East Arkansas Community College if:
(A) The Board of Directors of Crowley's Ridge Technical
Institute votes to merge with East Arkansas Community College;
(B) The Board of Directors of East Arkansas Community
College votes to accept the merger; and
(C) The merger is approved under § 6-53-401.
(2)(A)(i) When voting to accept a merger under subdivision
(a)(1)(B) of this section, the Board of Directors of East Arkansas Community
College shall designate a date for the merger to become effective.
(ii) The Board of Directors of East Arkansas
Community College shall consult the Board of Directors of Crowley's Ridge
Technical Institute in determining the date under subdivision (a)(2)(A)(i) of
this section.
(B) If a merger of Crowley's Ridge Technical Institute and
East Arkansas Community College is approved under § 6-53-401, the merger
shall become effective on the date designated under subdivision (a)(2)(A)(i)
of this section.
(b) On the effective date of a merger under subdivision (a)(2) of this
section, all statutory authority, powers, duties, functions, records,
personnel, property, unexpended balances of appropriations, allocations, or
other funds, including the functions of budgeting or purchasing, of Crowley's
Ridge Technical Institute shall be transferred to East Arkansas Community
College.

6-51-1102. Board of directors.
On the effective date of a merger under § 6-51-1101(a)(2):
01/13/2025 9:34:15 AM CRH024

SB46
(1) The Board of Directors of Crowley’s Ridge Technical
Institute shall be abolished; and
(2) The Board of Directors of East Arkansas Community College
shall assume the powers and duties of the Board of Directors of Crowley's
Ridge Technical Institute.

6-51-1103. Purchasing.
(a) Upon the vote of the Board of Directors of Crowley's Ridge
Technical Institute to merge with East Arkansas Community College under § 6-
51-1101(a)(1)(A) and before the effective date of a merger under § 6-51-
1101(a)(2):
(1) Purchases by Crowley's Ridge Technical Institute shall be
made under the Arkansas Procurement Law, § 19-11-201 et seq.; and
(2) Purchases by East Arkansas Community College may continue to
be made under procedures that were applicable to East Arkansas Community
College.
(b) This section shall not apply if a merger is not subsequently
approved under § 6-51-1101(a).

6-51-1104. Transfer of assets, obligations, records, personnel,
property, unexpended balances, and legal authority.
Beginning on the effective date of a merger under § 6-51-1101(a)(2):
(1) All property and other rights, claims, and assets of
Crowley’s Ridge Technical Institute shall be transferred to East Arkansas
Community College;
(2) All obligations of Crowley’s Ridge Technical Institute shall
be obligations of East Arkansas Community College;
(3)(A) Except as provided in subdivision (3)(B) of this section,
all records, personnel, property, unexpended balances, and legal authority
shall be transferred from Crowley’s Ridge Technical Institute to East
Arkansas Community College.
(B) If applicable, the personnel transferred from
Crowley's Ridge Technical Institute to East Arkansas Community College shall
comply with Acts 2017, No. 94, § 1, as amended by this subchapter; and
(4) All cash fund balances of Crowley's Ridge Technical
Institute transferred to East Arkansas Community College shall be used for
01/13/2025 9:34:15 AM CRH024

SB46
the operation, support, and improvement of occupational, vocational,
technical, and workforce development programs of East Arkansas Community
College.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code §§ 6-51-1105 and 6-51-1106 are amended to
read as follows:
6-51-1105. Funding from the Work Force 2000 Development Fund.
Beginning on the effective date of a merger under § 6-51-1101(a)(2),
funding from the Work Force 2000 Development Fund, which would have been
provided to Crowley’s Ridge Technical Institute, shall be provided to the
University of Arkansas East Arkansas Community College to fund workforce
development, vocational, occupational, and training programs offered by the
University of Arkansas East Arkansas Community College.

6-51-1106. Funding from the Federal Adult Basic Education Fund.
Beginning on the effective date of a merger under § 6-51-1101(a)(2),
funding from the Federal Adult Basic Education Fund, which would have been
provided to Crowley’s Ridge Technical Institute, shall be provided to the
University of Arkansas East Arkansas Community College.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 6-63-305(b)(8), concerning new or
additional positions at institutions of higher education, is amended to read
as follows:
(8) University of Arkansas East Arkansas Community College
40

SECTION 5. Arkansas Code § 19-4-906(a)(093), concerning the maximum
number of authorized passenger motor vehicles for East Arkansas Community
College, is amended to read as follows:
(093) University of Arkansas East Arkansas Community College 28

SECTION 6. Arkansas Code § 19-5-303(n), concerning funds of
institutions of higher education, is amended to read as follows:
(n) University of Arkansas East Arkansas Community College Fund.
(1) There is established on the books of the Treasurer of State,
the Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a fund to be
01/13/2025 9:34:15 AM CRH024

SB46
known as the “University of Arkansas East Arkansas Community College Fund”.
(2) The University of Arkansas East Arkansas Community College
Fund shall be used for the maintenance, operation, and improvement of the
University of Arkansas East Arkansas Community College.
(3) The University of Arkansas East Arkansas Community College
Fund shall consist of:
(A) Those general revenues as may be provided by law; and
(B) Any other funds made available for the support of the
University of Arkansas East Arkansas Community College which are required to
be deposited into the State Treasury by law.

SECTION 7. Arkansas Code § 19-11-220(a)(19), concerning state agencies
authorized to have an agency procurement official under the Arkansas
Procurement Law, is amended to read as follows:
(19) University of Arkansas East Arkansas Community College;





















01/13/2025 9:34:15 AM CRH024